Maine, session 132, LD1758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3173-L is enacted to read:
§3173-L. Provider enrollment; expedited provisional approval
The process for expedited provisional approval of provider enrollment in the
MaineCare program is governed by the following provisions.
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "National provider identifier" means a unique, 10-digit, intelligence-free,
identification number issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to a provider of medical or health services and any other person or
organization that furnishes, bills or is paid for health care in the normal course of
business. "Intelligence-free" means that the numbers do not carry other information
about a healthcare provider such as the state in which the provider lives or operates or
the provider's medical specialty.
B. "Provider" means an individual, a facility or an organization that provides services
under the MaineCare program.
2. Expedited provisional approval. The department shall provisionally approve the
enrollment application of a provider in good standing, as defined by rule pursuant to
subsection 6, paragraph C, subparagraph (1), that has a national provider identifier within
48 hours of receipt of a complete application if the provider is employed by a health care
entity that has an enrollment application approval rate of greater than 90% in the previous
5 years.
3. Authority to review; final approval. The department may conduct a complete
review of an applicant granted expedited provisional approval pursuant to this section. For
a provider that has received expedited provisional approval pursuant to subsection 2, the
provider's enrollment is considered finally approved 60 days following the receipt of the
provider's application for expedited provisional approval unless the department
affirmatively revoked the provisional approval during the 60-day period.
4. Approval suspended or revoked. Nothing in this section may prevent the
department from suspending or revoking the approval of an applicant that has been granted
expedited provisional approval following complete review if a material deficiency is
determined to exist. If the provider's approval is revoked, the provider is not eligible for
expedited provisional approval under subsection 2 and must go through the regular
enrollment process as provided by rule to regain enrollment.
5. Approval revoked; reimbursements for payments during period of provisional
approval. The Office of MaineCare Services may seek reimbursement for any payments
made by the MaineCare program for services provided by a provider if its expedited
provisional approval was revoked in the 60-day expedited provisional approval period
pursuant to subsection 3.
6. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules
must, at a minimum:
Page 1 - 132LR0823(01)

A. Prescribe a method to determine the enrollment application approval rate of the
provider's employer under subsection 2;
B. Develop a process for suspending an individual provider's expedited provisional
approval status; and
C. Define the following:
(1) The elements of "good standing," under subsection 2; and
(2) "Material deficiency" under subsection 4.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.